Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.467

Rental trailer.

"Rental trailer" means a trailer, as defined in RCW 46.04.620, that is used solely by a rental car business for rental to others for periods of not more than thirty consecutive days.

[ 2020 c 11 s 2.]